Connecticut, session 2026, HB05305.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17b-343 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Social Services shall establish annually the
maximum allowable rate to be paid by agencies for homemaker
services, chore person services, companion services, respite care, meals
on wheels, adult day care services, case management and assessment
services, transportation, mental health counseling and elderly foster
care. The Commissioner of Social Services shall prescribe uniform forms
on which agencies providing such services shall report their costs for
such services. Such rates shall be determined on the basis of a reasonable
payment for necessary services rendered. The maximum allowable rates
established by the Commissioner of Social Services for the Connecticut
home-care program for the elderly established under section 17b-342
shall constitute the rates required under this section until revised in
accordance with this section. The Commissioner of Social Services shall
establish a fee schedule, to be effective on and after July 1, 1994, for
HB5305 / File No. 98 1

HB5305 File No. 98
homemaker services, chore person services, companion services, respite
care, meals on wheels, adult day care services, case management and
assessment services, transportation, mental health counseling and
elderly foster care. The commissioner may annually increase the fee
schedule based on an increase in the cost of services. The commissioner
shall increase the fee schedule effective July 1, 2000, by not less than five
per cent, for adult day care services. The commissioner shall increase the
fee schedule effective July 1, 2011, by four dollars per person, per day
for adult day care services. The commissioner shall increase the fee
schedule effective July 1, 2026, for adult day care services by ten per cent
over the fee schedule for adult day care services for the previous fiscal
year for the purpose of providing increased funding for adult day care
transportation. Effective July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall increase the fee schedule for adult day care services
by, at a minimum, the cost-of-living adjustment as measured by the
consumer price index. The commissioner shall increase the fee schedule
effective July 1, 2019, for meals on wheels by ten per cent over the fee
schedule for meals on wheels for the previous fiscal year. Effective July
1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the commissioner may increase the fee
schedule for meals on wheels providers serving participants in the
Connecticut home-care program for the elderly by, at a minimum, the
cost-of-living adjustment as measured by the consumer price index. The
commissioner may increase any fee payable to a meals on wheels
provider upon the application of such provider evidencing
extraordinary costs related to delivery of meals on wheels in sparsely
populated rural regions of the state. Nothing contained in this section
shall authorize a payment by the state to any agency for such services in
excess of the amount charged by such agency for such services to the
general public.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-343
AGE Joint Favorable
HB5305 / File No. 98 2

HB5305 File No. 98
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost At least At least
730,000 875,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS) of
at least $730,000 in FY 27 and $875,000 in FY 28. These figures reflect a
10% increase in the adult day services fee schedule for FY 27, followed
by annual cost-of-living adjustments tied to the Consumer Price Index
(CPI)1 starting in FY 28.
Based on historical utilization levels, this reflects both the state share
of Medicaid costs (approximately $665,000 in FY 27 and $800,000 in FY
28) and costs under the state-funded Connecticut Home Care Program
(approximately $65,000 in FY 27 and $75,000 in FY 28). The purpose of
the funding is to provide increased support for adult day care
transportation.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to service utilization and CPI changes.
This is based on the CPI-U of 2.7% for the 12 months ending in December 2025.
HB5305 / File No. 98 3

HB5305 File No. 98
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5305
AN ACT CONCERNING ADULT DAY CENTER TRANSPORTATION.